Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2506
Minimum wage scale laws; not applicable.

The mere fact that an employee participates in any kind of ride-sharing arrangement shall not result in the application of Chapter 48, article 12, relating to payment of a minimum wage, overtime pay, or otherwise regulating the hours a person may work.

Laws 1981, LB 50, § 6.